Louisiana, session 2026, SB502.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:3602(18) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 3:3602(19) and
3607(E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3602. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(18) "Sugarcane bagasse biomass" means the solid, heterogeneous,
fibrous material that remains after extracting the liquid from sugarcane stalks,
which may include but is not limited to the following:
(a) Biomass derived from factory bagasse which is obtained from the
industrial extraction process and contains only trace amounts of the sugarcane
liquid.
(b) Biomass derived from pressed cane stalks or farm bagasse which is
obtained from on-farm or small factory extraction and contains higher amounts
of sugarcane liquid.
(c) Dewatered pulp derived from bagasse, recognized by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency as a fuel pursuant to 40 CFR 241.4.
(19) "Traditional farm practices" means those accepted and customary
standards established by similar agricultural operations under similar circumstances
using established best management practices. Best management practices for animal
feeding operations and confined animal feeding operations shall be determined by
the Louisiana Department of Agriculture and Forestry in conjunction with the LSU
AgCenter.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 502 ENROLLED
* * *
§3607. Local ordinances
* * *
E. No parish or municipal governing authority may enact or enforce any
ordinance prohibiting the storage of sugarcane bagasse biomass when it is
stored in accordance with a best management practice plan that has been
approved by the Department of Agriculture and Forestry in writing and
provided to the Department of Environmental Quality.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.